Illinois, session 104th, HB5486.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Office 5of Genealogical Affairs Study Commission Act. 6    Section 5. Legislative findings and purpose. 7    (a) The General Assembly finds that: 8        (1) Illinois has a documented history of slavery, 9    coerced labor, family separation, racial violence, and 10    State-sanctioned discrimination, including, but not 11    limited to, the enslavement of African Americans at 12    State-operated salt mines, the enforcement of Black Codes, 13    and the long-term exclusion of African American families 14    from full civic participation. 15        (2) These historical practices resulted in the 16    systematic destruction, fragmentation, or non-creation of 17    genealogical records for African American families and 18    other historically displaced populations, impairing their 19    ability to document family identity, lineage, and 20    inheritance. 21        (3) Illinois recognizes genealogical access as a 22    public service and democratic good through its archival, 23    records preservation, and genealogical programs, and it   HB5486 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 17770 TRT 31202 b1    recognizes family identity as a legally protected interest 2    for the purposes of adoption, parentage, and child welfare 3    law. 4        (4) Genealogical knowledge serves not only 5    administrative purposes but also reparative, forensic, 6    public health, and psychosocial functions, including 7    identity formation, family reunification, historical 8    accountability, and access to health-related genetic 9    information. 10        (5) The State lacks an integrated framework for 11    delivering genealogical services across restorative, 12    forensic, and administrative domains, particularly where 13    traditional documentation is absent. 14    (b) Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to commission a 15comprehensive study on the establishment of an Office of 16Genealogical Affairs, grounded in Illinois law and public 17service traditions, to determine how the State may equitably 18provide genealogical services that support identity repair, 19historical accountability, and, where applicable, 20administrative determinations. 21    Section 10. Office of Genealogical Affairs Study 22Commission. 23    (a) The Office of Genealogical Affairs Study Commission is 24created. The members of the Commission shall be as follows: 25        (1) 10 public members appointed by the Governor with   HB5486 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 17770 TRT 31202 b1    specialties in the following areas or with the following 2    expertise: 3            (A) expertise in anthropology and population 4        genetics genealogy;5            (B) expertise in biological anthropology;6            (C) expertise in cultural anthropology;7            (D) specialty in archival studies;8            (E) specialty in historical studies;9            (F) specialty in genealogy; 10            (G) specialty in psycho-social or psycho-mental 11        health; and 12            (H) specialty in data governance, privacy, and 13        security;14        (2) 2 members that are descendant community leadership 15    representatives appointed by the Governor;16        (3) one public health professional from a 17    nongovernmental organization or academic institution 18    appointed by the Governor;19        (4) one member appointed by the President of the 20    Senate;21        (5) one member appointed by the Minority Leader of the 22    Senate;23        (6) one member appointed by the Speaker of the House 24    of Representatives;25        (7) one member appointed by the Minority Leader of the 26    House of Representatives; and  HB5486 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 17770 TRT 31202 b1        (8) 3 ex officio members:2            (A) the Secretary of State, as the State 3        Archivist, or the Secretary's designee; and4            (B) the Director of the Illinois State Archives, 5        or the Director's designee.6            (C) a Director of the Illinois State Genealogical 7        Society or a Director's designee.8    (b) Commission members appointed under paragraphs (3) 9through (6) of subsection (a) shall co-chair the Commission.10    (c) Each Commission member shall serve for a term of 2 11years or until his or her successor is appointed and 12qualified, except in the case of initial appointees who shall 13serve for a period of 2 years after the effective date of this 14Act.15    (d) Beginning August 2026, the Commission shall meet 16monthly, whether in-person or virtually, or as called by the 17co-chairs of the Commission. 18    Section 15. Duties of the Commission. 19    (a) The Commission shall have the following duties: 20        (1) to examine the feasibility, scope, and structure 21    of a permanent Office of Genealogical Affairs within State 22    government; 23        (2) to examine how an Office of Genealogical Affairs 24    could operationalize reparative genealogical services; 25        (3) to examine how an Office of Genealogical Affairs   HB5486 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 17770 TRT 31202 b1    could support forensic and historical accountability 2    efforts; and 3        (4) to examine how an Office of Genealogical Affairs 4    could support administrative genealogical determinations.5    (b) The Commission may engage with experts with the 6approval of the chairperson or co-chairs and shall receive the 7cooperation of those State agencies it deems appropriate to 8assist the Commission in carrying out its duties.9    (c) The Commission may consult with the Department of 10Human Services, the Department of Public Health, the Illinois 11State Archives, and the African Descent-Citizens Reparations 12Commission to provide information or related data to support 13the Commission's work. 14    Section 20. Report to the Governor and General Assembly. 15No later than 20 months after the effective date of this Act, 16the Commission shall prepare a report to the Governor and the 17General Assembly, which shall include, but shall not be 18limited to: 19        (1) a recommended statutory placement, governance 20    structure, and staffing model for an Office of 21    Genealogical Affairs; 22        (2) a phased implementation plan prioritizing 23    reparative forensic services; 24        (3) an ethical, legal, and data-governance framework 25    for genealogical and genetic genealogy services;   HB5486 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 17770 TRT 31202 b1        (4) a description of the estimated costs, funding 2    mechanisms, and interagency coordination needs; and 3        (5) a description of the options for pilot programs 4    and statewide scaling. 5    Section 25. Construction. Nothing in this Act shall be 6construed to mandate genetic testing, limit access to existing 7genealogical services, or authorize the use of genealogical 8data for surveillance or for law enforcement purposes.  9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.